Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.532

Concealed or embezzled property—Proceedings for discovery.

The court shall have authority to bring before it, in the manner prescribed by RCW 11.48.070, any person or persons suspected of having in their possession or having concealed, embezzled, conveyed, or disposed of any of the property of the estate of the individual subject to conservatorship subject to administration of this title.

[ 2024 c 267 s 14.]